trunk/apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns-already-added.dix
<pardef n="tank__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/ånd__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>åndet</l>     <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånd</l>       <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånden</l>     <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änderna</l>   <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="farbr/or__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odern</l>     <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orn</l>       <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öder</l>      <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öderna</l>    <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="näbb__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fransk/a__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sp/ann__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>annar</l>     <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änner</l>     <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ann</l>       <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annarna</l>   <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ännerna</l>   <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annen</l>     <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mörk/er__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lexik/on__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>onet</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onen</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="met/er__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pansar__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="spektr/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ägar/e__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="centimeter">      <i>centimet</i><par n="met/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="invandrare">      <i>invandrar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skrivare">        <i>skrivar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="finländare">      <i>finländar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="cd-spelare">      <i>cd-spelar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="liter">           <i>lit</i><par n="met/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="utgivare">        <i>utgivar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="urmakare">        <i>urmakar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="löpare">          <i>löpar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="murare">          <i>murar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lärare">          <i>lärar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sångare">         <i>sångar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ungrare">         <i>ungrar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="talare">          <i>talar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="krigare">         <i>krigar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="arbetare">        <i>arbetar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="näbb">            <i>näbb</i><par n="näbb__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="brevbärare">      <i>brevbärar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mätare">          <i>mätar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="samlare">         <i>samlar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tiggare">         <i>tiggar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="millimeter">      <i>millimet</i><par n="met/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bagare">          <i>bagar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dammsugare">      <i>dammsugar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kubikmeter">      <i>kubikmet</i><par n="met/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sol-och-vårare">  <i>sol-och-vårar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="order">           <i>ord</i><par n="met/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kejsare">         <i>kejsar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="meter">           <i>met</i><par n="met/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="slaktare">        <i>slaktar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="spektrum">        <i>spektr</i><par n="spektr/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="silver">          <i>silv</i><par n="mörk/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="aktieägare">      <i>aktieägar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="domare">          <i>domar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="farbror">         <i>farbr</i><par n="farbr/or__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="arbetsgivare">    <i>arbetsgivar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="zigenare">        <i>zigenar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="deltagare">       <i>deltagar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="frimurare">       <i>frimurar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="medborgare">      <i>medborgar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="franska">         <i>fransk</i><par n="fransk/a__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="innehavare">      <i>innehavar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="köpare">          <i>köpar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pansar">          <i>pansar</i><par n="pansar__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="trumslagare">     <i>trumslagar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fotgängare">      <i>fotgängar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mörker">          <i>mörk</i><par n="mörk/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dykare">          <i>dykar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ledare">          <i>ledar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kilometer">       <i>kilomet</i><par n="met/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lexikon">         <i>lexik</i><par n="lexik/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="roller">          <i>roll</i><par n="met/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="spann">           <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ann__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lokförare">       <i>lokförar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tank">            <i>tank</i><par n="tank__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="trick">           <i>trick</i><par n="näbb__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="författare">      <i>författar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="jorden-runt-seglare"><i>jorden-runt-seglar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skidåkare">       <i>skidåkar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mp3-spelare">     <i>mp3-spelar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="snickare">        <i>snickar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stånd">           <i>st</i><par n="st/ånd__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="användare">       <i>användar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stopp">           <i>stopp</i><par n="näbb__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="fågelskådare">    <i>fågelskådar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="italienare">      <i>italienar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kvadratmeter">    <i>kvadratmet</i><par n="met/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="programmerare">   <i>programmerar</i><par n="ägar/e__n_ut"/></e>
